pt-PT: Cor dos dentes da dentadura: Amarelo claro; Branco natural; Branco acizentado; Outro
pl: Kolor zębów protezy: Jasny żółty; Naturalna biel; Złamana biel; Inne
sk-SK: Farba zubov zubnej protézy: Svetlo žltý; Prírodná biela; Špinavobiela; Iné
fr: Couleur des dents du dentier: Jaune clair; Blanc naturel; Blanc cassé; Autre
ru: Цвет зубных коронок: Светло-желтый; Натуральный белый; Кремовый; Другой
el: Χρώμα δοντιών οδοντοστοιχίας: Ανοιχτό κίτρινο; Φυσικό λευκό; Υπόλευκο; Άλλο
fi: Hammasproteesin hammasväri: Vaaleankeltainen; Luonnonvalkoinen; Murrettu valkoinen; Muu
hu: Fogsor fogainak színe: Világos sárga; Természetes fehér; Törtfehér; Egyéb
pt-BR: Cor dos dentes da dentadura: Amarelo claro; Branco natural; Off white; Outro
de: Zahnfarbe der Prothese: Hellgelb; Natürliches Weiß; Cremefarben; Sonstiges
es: Color de los dientes de la dentadura: Amarillo claro; Blanco natural; Blanquecino; Otros
bg-BG: Цвят на зъбите на зъбната протезата: Светло жълт; Естествено бял; Мръсно бял; Други
en: Denture teeth color: Light yellow; Natural white; Off-white; Other
zh-TW: 假牙顏色: 淺黃色; 天然白; 米白色; 其他
da: Protesetandfarve: Lysegul; Naturlig hvid; Råhvid; Andet
lt-LT: Dantų protezo dantų spalva: Šviesiai geltona; Natūrali balta; Balkšva; Kita
zh-CN: 义齿牙齿颜色: 浅黄色; 天然白; 米白色; 其他
ro-RO: Culoare dinți proteză: Galben deschis; Alb natural; Albicioasă; Altele
nl: Kleur kunstgebittanden: Lichtgeel; Natuurlijk wit; Gebroken wit; Andere
hr-HR: Boja zuba zubne proteze: Svijetlo žuta; Prirodna bijela; Prljavo bijela; Ostalo
cs: Barva zubů zubní protézy: Světle žlutá; Přírodní bílá; Špinavě bílá; Jiné
sv: Färg på tandproteser: Ljusgul; Naturvit; Off-white; Övrigt
tr: Protez Diş Rengi: Açık sarı; Doğal beyaz; Kirli beyaz; Diğer
vi: Màu răng giả: Vàng nhạt; Trắng tự nhiên; Trắng ngà; Khác
nb: Farge på tannprotese: Lys gul; Naturlig hvit; Hvitaktig; Annet
ko: 의치 치아 색상: 밝은 노랑; 자연스러운 흰색; 미색; 기타
th: สีฟันปลอม: สีเหลืองอ่อน; สีขาวตามเธรรมชาติ; สีขาวนวล; อื่นๆ
ja: 義歯の色: 薄黄色; ナチュラルホワイト; オフホワイト; その他
sl-SI: Barva zob na zobni protezi: Svetlo rumena; Naravna bela; Umazano bela; Drugo
it: Colore dei denti della protesi: Giallo chiaro; Bianco naturale; Bianco; Altro